21 July 2014 Last updated at 02:05
Losing a baby early in pregnancy is a distressing event that many women go through. But how do their partners cope with the emotional impact of miscarriage?

According to research from the Miscarriage Association and University College London, partners often feel unable to talk about their feelings of loss and pain. 

They keep their feelings hidden for fear of upsetting their wife or partner or saying the wrong thing.

A lack of information about support groups after miscarriage also left many feeling isolated and excluded.

You never get to see them grow and you fantasise about things you could have done together. It stays with you forever.”

Mahdi Hassan, from Streatham, south London, wanted to support his wife after a miscarriage at 16 weeks, but he also realised he needed support himself.

"I did go straight back to work but then I felt I needed time off and took two weeks off.

"I'm a bus driver, and I've been quite emotional at work. When driving one day I found myself crying."

When Mr Hassan, 38, started talking to people at work about how he was feeling, some colleagues revealed they also had experience of miscarriage.

Simply being able to open up to people made him feel better, he says.

"It's quite unfortunate but there should be more support for men. We are put on the back bench.

"Miscarriage is such a bad experience to go through. You never forget your first child. 

"You never get to see them grow and you fantasise about things you could have done together. It stays with you forever."

UCL researchers spoke to 186 partners of women who had miscarried to find out how they coped during and after their loss. 

Their findings show that 46% of partners did not share all their feelings with their wife or partner for fear of causing further distress and 22% did not talk about any feelings of loss and pain with their partner.

As a result, nearly half of those questioned said it affected their work and 47% reported having sleep problems.

When asked about the quality of healthcare they received, the majority of partners said they were not told of any support groups for people who had experienced miscarriage. 

One in five partners said they felt excluded by healthcare staff and and one in three said they were not given enough information about what was going on.

From the stories they provided of their experiences, the Miscarriage Association has produced information leaflets, films and cartoons for a public awareness campaign entitled Partners Too.

Friends and family often ask how the woman who has miscarried is coping, but never think to ask her partner”

Ruth Bender Atik, national director of the Miscarriage Association, said the research shows that partners often feel invisible during and after miscarriage or ectopic pregnancy.

"Friends and family often ask how the woman who has miscarried is coping, but never think to ask her partner.

"All too often the voices of partners go unheard and their needs go unmet."

She said the campaign was an important way of showing partners that they are not alone, as well as telling them where they can find support.

Erin went through three miscarriages before finally having a baby boy in 2012. Her partner Rachel said all the care was focused on Erin, but she was able to talk to family and friends about how she was feeling, which was very helpful.

"Women have a history of talking openly about awkward things and Erin and I wanted to talk to each other about it," she says.

Where she felt they were let down was after the first miscarriage, when they were waiting for the follow-up hospital appointment.

"The entrance to the water birthing suite was close by and we found that difficult.

"At the appointment we were given no information at all about further care or support groups. 

"I mean, how difficult is it to give someone a leaflet?"

The Miscarriage Association wants to remedy that - and make sure that the grief and distress of women who have miscarried and their partners are not overlooked.

Miscarriage is when a woman loses a baby any time up to 24 weeks of pregnancy. 

After 24 weeks, losing a baby during pregnancy or labour is called a stillbirth.

No-one knows exactly how many miscarriages happen, but experts think that more than one pregnancy in every five ends in miscarriage.

These include ectopic pregnancies, when a fertilised egg implants itself outside the womb, and molar pregnancies, where the placenta and foetus do not form properly and a baby does not develop.

21 July 2014 Last updated at 13:04
A nurse has been convicted of grooming and trying to lure a 14-year-old girl to England because he allegedly wanted to kill and eat her. Dale Bolinger said his actions were part of an online role-play, but how do police know when a cannibalism fantasy risks crossing the line into reality?

The day before he was due to meet "Eva" - a teenager living in Germany - Bolinger bought an axe from Homebase. 

During an internet chat he had told her: "Got the axe, you ready to get that train?" and added: "The idea of making love and then eating you is a very great turn-on."

The girl - whose true identity has never been discovered - did not turn up at Ashford International station. However, Bolinger did.

Months later he was arrested by Kent Police following a tip off by the FBI.

The bureau had been investigating a former NYPD officer, dubbed the "cannibal cop".

Cannibal fantasies have been around since the earliest times, but the difference in the modern era is that before it was difficult to share these”

Gilberto Valles had been using a website, Dark Fetish Network (DFN), to discuss killing and eating women and had been in contact with Bolinger.

Thousands of pages of chat logs were sent to England for investigation.

"It's some of the worst stuff I've ever seen and I've been in child protection for seven years," said Kent Police's Det Insp Rob Chitham, who investigated Bolinger.

"Over time you think you have witnessed the depths of depravity, but he plumbed it again."

During the trial Bolinger's lawyers claimed he was a fantasist - "more Walter Mitty than Hannibal Lecter".

However, Det Insp Chitham said: "Where the fantasy defence ceases is when the individual steps outside the virtual world and takes action within the real world.

"That is when you start to get a lot more concerned.

"Bolinger stepped outside the virtual world when he made specific plans to meet the girl and purchased an axe to decapitate her."

In the USA, Valles was convicted of plotting to murder and eat women in March.

However, this was overturned by a judge at the beginning of July, due to insufficient evidence that the plot was real.

Bolinger also claimed he had no intention of carrying out his fantasies and - had "Eva" turned up at Ashford International Station - would have taken her home and contacted social services. 

"I have heard more convincing defences," said Det Insp Chitham.

"Cannibal fantasies have been around since the earliest times, but the difference in the modern era is that before it was difficult to share these."

"He's a very dangerous man in my view and he's held these fantasies for a number of years, since his teens."Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

21 July 2014 Last updated at 12:07 BST

Paul Adams reports from the almost deserted streets of Shaaf in Gaza where rockets are "coming in all the time"

At least five people have been killed and 70 injured by an Israeli strike on a hospital in Gaza, Palestinians say.

Doctors say several Israeli tank shells hit the hospital's reception, intensive care unit and operating theatres.

Overnight, more than 30 members of two Palestinian families died in Israeli strikes, Gazan health officials said.

Meanwhile, Hamas launched fresh rocket attacks. Israel said 10 militants had been killed after using tunnels to get into Israel near the town of Sderot.

The Palestinian death toll from the two-week conflict has now passed 500, the majority of them civilians, according to Gaza's health ministry.

Israel says it has killed more than 170 militants since Thursday night, when it launched the ground offensive phase of its two-week old operation to end rocket fire from Gaza.

Twenty Israelis - 18 of them soldiers - have died, Israel says.

Palestinian television showed footage of wounded people being treated after the strike at the Al-Aqsa Hospital in Deir al-Balah in the central Gaza Strip.

Most of the wounded were doctors, according to Palestinian officials.

Appeals have been made to the Red Cross to help evacuate patients from the building, the BBC's Yolande Knell reports from Gaza.

Israel had told residents of neighbouring areas to head to Deir al-Balah for their own safety as its ground offensive continues to target neighbourhoods to the east of Gaza City for a second day, our correspondent adds.

In Egypt, US Secretary of State John Kerry is due to hold talks to try to arrange a ceasefire.

The UN Security Council has issued a call for an "immediate cessation of hostilities", but did not endorse a strongly worded draft resolution backed by Arab states.

President Barack Obama said the US had "serious concerns about the rising number of Palestinian civilian deaths and the loss of Israeli lives", and said the focus of the international community should be "to bring about a ceasefire... that can stop the deaths of innocent civilians".

UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon has criticised an Israeli operation in the densely populated area of Shejaiya on Sunday as "an atrocious action".

At least 67 people were reported killed in the assault on Shejaiya, which Israel said was a "terror stronghold".

The UN says 43% of Gaza is now "affected by evacuation warnings" or declared a "no-go area". In the past four days, the numbers seeking shelter in UN-run schools shot up by 400%.

The UN is running out of supplies, morgues run out of space, and hospital wards are packed.

As the days go by, there's a sad familiar choreography to Gaza's recurrent wars. As the news gets grimmer, the demands mount for an urgent ceasefire.

And as the chorus of concern grows, both sides know their time may be running out, so military operations escalate, and the human cost deepens.

Shejaiya assault defines grimmest day

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

John Kerry, who was apparently unaware he was being recorded, said: "It's a hell of a pinpoint operation" - speaking on US TV network Fox News

Sunday was the deadliest day of the conflict so far; more than 100 Palestinians and 13 Israeli soldiers lost their lives.

Palestinian emergency services spokesman Ashraf al-Qudra said nine members of one family were killed in Israeli attacks on Rafah, on the border with Egypt.

In Khan Younis, in the south of Gaza, at least 23 members of one family died when a building was hit by an Israeli air strike, officials said. 

"Doesn't this indicate that Israel is ruthless? Are we the liars?" family member Sabri Abu Jamea told the Associated Press news agency. 

"The evidence is here in the morgue refrigerators."

Further north, Israel continued its ground operation in the eastern fringes of Gaza City. 

After moving into the Shejaiya neighbourhood on Sunday in search of rocket sites and tunnels, nearby areas were pounded with artillery on Monday morning.

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Benjamin Netanyahu: "I regret any civilian casualty"

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Palestinian UN envoy Riyad Mansour: UN "must shoulder responsibility"

The BBC's Paul Adams, at the scene, reports that more than 83,000 people across Gaza have taken refuge in schools run by the UN. 

Sunday's operation in Shejaiya prompted chaotic scenes, with thousands of residents fleeing and images of children being pulled from the wreckage of buildings.

Israel sent ground troops into Gaza after days of heavy air and naval barrages failed to stop rocket fire.

Israel says the ground operation is necessary to target Hamas' network of tunnels, which have been used by militants to get into Israel and carry out attacks.

But the UN, Palestinians and Arab states have expressed alarm at the number of civilian casualties.

21 July 2014 Last updated at 20:15

A Ukrainian train carrying bodies from the Malaysia Airlines plane crash has left the station of the town of Torez.

Officials say the train will go to Kharkiv, but there is no confirmation.

Pro-Russian separatists, who are in control of the crash site, had placed the remains of the passengers of flight MH17 in refrigerated carriages.

Western countries say the plane was shot down by the rebels. There has been heavy fighting in the main rebel-held city of Donetsk on Monday.Media playback is unsupported on your device

21 July 2014 Last updated at 15:04 BST 

Three Dutch investigators have examined bodies from the crashed Malaysia Airlines passenger plane, which are being kept on a train in east Ukraine. 

The experts said the train may later leave the rebel-held town of Torez to start identification process.

All 298 people on board MH17 died - the Ukrainian government says 272 bodies have been recovered.

Natalia Antelava reports.Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

22 July 2014 Last updated at 01:51
Paul Adams reports from the almost deserted streets of Shaaf in Gaza where rockets are "coming in all the time"

At least five people have been killed and 70 injured by an Israeli strike on a hospital in Gaza, Palestinians say.

Doctors say several Israeli tank shells hit the hospital's reception, intensive care unit and operating theatres.

Overnight, more than 30 members of two Palestinian families died in Israeli strikes, Gazan health officials said.

Meanwhile, Hamas launched fresh rocket attacks. Israel said 10 militants had been killed after using tunnels to get into Israel near the town of Sderot.

The Palestinian death toll from the two-week conflict has now passed 500, the majority of them civilians, according to Gaza's health ministry.

Israel says it has killed more than 170 militants since Thursday night, when it launched the ground offensive phase of its two-week old operation to end rocket fire from Gaza.

Twenty Israelis - 18 of them soldiers - have died, Israel says.

Palestinian television showed footage of wounded people being treated after the strike at the Al-Aqsa Hospital in Deir al-Balah in the central Gaza Strip.

Most of the wounded were doctors, according to Palestinian officials.

Appeals have been made to the Red Cross to help evacuate patients from the building, the BBC's Yolande Knell reports from Gaza.

Israel had told residents of neighbouring areas to head to Deir al-Balah for their own safety as its ground offensive continues to target neighbourhoods to the east of Gaza City for a second day, our correspondent adds.

In Egypt, US Secretary of State John Kerry is due to hold talks to try to arrange a ceasefire.

The UN Security Council has issued a call for an "immediate cessation of hostilities", but did not endorse a strongly worded draft resolution backed by Arab states.

President Barack Obama said the US had "serious concerns about the rising number of Palestinian civilian deaths and the loss of Israeli lives", and said the focus of the international community should be "to bring about a ceasefire... that can stop the deaths of innocent civilians".

UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon has criticised an Israeli operation in the densely populated area of Shejaiya on Sunday as "an atrocious action".

At least 67 people were reported killed in the assault on Shejaiya, which Israel said was a "terror stronghold".

The UN says 43% of Gaza is now "affected by evacuation warnings" or declared a "no-go area". In the past four days, the numbers seeking shelter in UN-run schools shot up by 400%.

The UN is running out of supplies, morgues run out of space, and hospital wards are packed.

As the days go by, there's a sad familiar choreography to Gaza's recurrent wars. As the news gets grimmer, the demands mount for an urgent ceasefire.

And as the chorus of concern grows, both sides know their time may be running out, so military operations escalate, and the human cost deepens.

Shejaiya assault defines grimmest day

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

John Kerry, who was apparently unaware he was being recorded, said: "It's a hell of a pinpoint operation" - speaking on US TV network Fox News

Sunday was the deadliest day of the conflict so far; more than 100 Palestinians and 13 Israeli soldiers lost their lives.

Palestinian emergency services spokesman Ashraf al-Qudra said nine members of one family were killed in Israeli attacks on Rafah, on the border with Egypt.

In Khan Younis, in the south of Gaza, at least 23 members of one family died when a building was hit by an Israeli air strike, officials said. 

"Doesn't this indicate that Israel is ruthless? Are we the liars?" family member Sabri Abu Jamea told the Associated Press news agency. 

"The evidence is here in the morgue refrigerators."

Further north, Israel continued its ground operation in the eastern fringes of Gaza City. 

After moving into the Shejaiya neighbourhood on Sunday in search of rocket sites and tunnels, nearby areas were pounded with artillery on Monday morning.

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Benjamin Netanyahu: "I regret any civilian casualty"

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Palestinian UN envoy Riyad Mansour: UN "must shoulder responsibility"

The BBC's Paul Adams, at the scene, reports that more than 83,000 people across Gaza have taken refuge in schools run by the UN. 

Sunday's operation in Shejaiya prompted chaotic scenes, with thousands of residents fleeing and images of children being pulled from the wreckage of buildings.

Israel sent ground troops into Gaza after days of heavy air and naval barrages failed to stop rocket fire.

Israel says the ground operation is necessary to target Hamas' network of tunnels, which have been used by militants to get into Israel and carry out attacks.

But the UN, Palestinians and Arab states have expressed alarm at the number of civilian casualties.

21 July 2014 Last updated at 04:21
HIV can rapidly form invulnerable strongholds in the body, dashing hopes that early treatment might cure the virus, according to new research. 

A baby was thought to have been cured with treatment hours after birth, but the virus emerged years later.

Monkey research, published in the journal Nature, suggests untouchable "viral reservoirs" form even before HIV can be detected in the blood.

Experts described it as a "sobering" and "striking" finding.

Reservoirs of HIV in the gut and brain tissue are the massive obstacle in the way of a cure.

Remarkable progress in developing antiretroviral drugs means HIV can be kept in check in the bloodstream and patients have a near-normal life expectancy.

But if the drugs stop, the virus will emerge from its reservoirs. 

International research is focused on flushing the virus out of its reservoirs, but there had been hope that early treatment could prevent them forming in the first place. 

In the study, rhesus monkeys were infected with the monkey equivalent of HIV - simian immunodeficiency virus (SIV).

The monkeys were then given antiretroviral drugs as early as three days or as late as two weeks after infection. 

Treatment stopped after six months, but the virus re-emerged irrespective of how quickly antiretroviral treatment started. 

It showed that viral reservoirs formed incredibly early in the course of the infection. 

Dan Barouch, professor of medicine at Harvard Medical School, said: "Our data show that in this animal model, the viral reservoir was seeded substantially earlier after infection than was previously recognised.

"We found that the reservoir was established in tissues during the first few days of infection, before the virus was even detected in the blood."

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Three quarters of new HIV cases are in just 15 countries 

It had been believed a baby girl born with HIV had been cured after very early treatment.

The "Mississippi baby" was given HIV drugs for the first 18 months of life, but then they were stopped. 

Initially the virus did not return and there was hope she had been effectively cured.

But last week it was announced that the girl, now four years old, was no longer in remission after nearly two years off the drugs.

"The unfortunate news of the virus rebounding in this child further emphasises the need to understand the early and refractory viral reservoir that is established very quickly following HIV infection in humans," Prof Barouch added.

Kai Deng and Robert Siliciano, of the School of Medicine at Johns Hopkins University, in Baltimore, Maryland, commented: "These data indicate that the viral reservoir could be seeded substantially earlier than previously assumed, a sobering finding that poses additional hurdles to HIV eradication efforts.

"Although early treatment may not prevent reservoir seeding, it has been consistently shown to reduce the size of the reservoir." 

They highlighted significant differences between these experiments and the human HIV infection, but concluded that the findings "suggest new approaches in addition to early treatment will be necessary to eradicate HIV infection".

20 July 2014 Last updated at 02:31
The rate of HIV infections diagnosed in the United States has fallen by a third over the past decade, researchers say.

After examining cases from all 50 states, the study found that the diagnosis rate fell to 16.1 per 100,000 people in 2011 from 24.1 in 2002. 
f
Experts celebrated the findings as a hopeful sign that the Aids epidemic may be slowing in the country.

However, there was a rise in new cases of HIV among gay and bisexual men aged under 24 and over 45.

HIV is the virus that causes Aids, a disease which destroys the immune system. 

The World Health Organization estimates 35 million people globally have the virus. More than 1 million people in the US are thought to be infected, with 18% unaware of their infections.

From 2002 to 2011, 493,372 people were diagnosed with HIV in the US, researchers said.

As well as an overall decline, declines were also seen in the rates for men, women, whites, blacks, Hispanics, heterosexuals, injection drug users and most age groups. 

Researchers said the only group in which diagnoses increased was gay and bisexual men.

"Among men who have sex with men, unprotected risk behaviours in the presence of high prevalence and unsuppressed viral load may continue to drive HIV transmission," the report said.

The study also found diagnosis rates dropped even as the amount of testing rose. 

In 2006, the US Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) recommended routine HIV testing for all Americans aged 13 to 64. 

The percentage of adults ever tested for HIV increased from 37% in 2000 to 45% in 2010, according to CDC data.

Although experts say reasons for the US decline in infections are unknown, it is in line with a global downturn in the Aids epidemic. 

Last week, the United Nations said that there were 2.1 million new HIV infections worldwide in 2013, down 38% from 2001.

The study was released online by the Journal of the American Medical Association ahead of the International Aids Conference that starts in Melbourne, Australia, on Sunday.Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

18 July 2014 Last updated at 19:21 BST
House of Lords

Legalising assisting dying would mean "less suffering not more deaths", a leading campaigner has said.

Lord Falconer, whose private member's bill would legalise the practice for some terminally ill patients, said a "limited" change was needed to the law to give people choice on their deaths.

But Lord Tebbit said it would create "too much of a financial incentive for the taking of life".

The bill passed its second reading in the Lords on Friday without a vote.

The proposed legislation would allow doctors to prescribe a lethal dose to terminally ill patients judged to have less than six months to live. 

Making the case for his bill, Lord Falconer insisted that the "final decision must always be made by the patient", with safeguards to prevent "abuse" 

About 130 peers requested to speak in a debate that lasted for around 10 hours.

The bill will now be examined line-by-line by peers in the Lords as it passes to committee stage. 

However, without government backing, MPs are unlikely to get a chance to debate it in the Commons, meaning it will not become law.

Prime Minister David Cameron has said he is not "convinced" by the arguments for legalising assisted dying but the bill has won the backing of Lib Dem Care Minister Norman Lamb.

The legislation would allow a terminally ill, mentally competent adult, making the choice of their own free will and after meeting strict legal safeguards, to request life-ending medication from a doctor. 

Two independent doctors would be required to agree that the patient had made an informed decision to die.

Opening the debate in a packed house, Lord Falconer - a former Labour Lord Chancellor - told peers the current legal situation permitted the wealthy to travel abroad to take their own life while others were left "in despair" to suffer a "lonely, cruel death".

"The current situation leaves the rich able to go to Switzerland, the majority reliant on amateur assistants, the compassionate treated like criminals and no safeguards in terms of undue pressure now," he said.

He said many people were so worried about "implicating their loves ones in a criminal enterprise" by asking them for help to die that they took their lives "by hoarding pills or putting a plastic bag over their heads".

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Baroness Wheatcroft said her mother was in agony and "would have used a loaded gun"

Legalising assisted dying, he argued would allow a "small number" of people who didn't want to "go through the last months, weeks, days and hours" of life to die with dignity.

Lord Falconer's bill was backed by Lord Avebury, the former Liberal MP, who was diagnosed with terminal blood cancer in 2011.

He urged peers to consider helping thousands of people whom he said faced "weeks of torture before they die a means of escaping from that unnecessary fate".

Former Archbishop of Canterbury Lord Carey said he had changed his mind about the issue and now believed that belief in assisted dying was "quite compatible" with being a Christian.

"When suffering is so great, when some patients already know that they are at the end of life, make repeated pleas to die, it seems a denial of the loving compassion that is the hallmark of Christianity to refuse to allow them to fulfil their clearly stated request," he said. 

The 1961 Suicide Act makes it an offence to encourage or assist a suicide or a suicide attempt in England and Wales. Anyone doing so could face up to 14 years in prison.

The law is almost identical in Northern Ireland. There is no specific law on assisted suicide in Scotland, creating some uncertainty, although in theory someone could be prosecuted under homicide legislation.

There have already been several attempts to legalise assisted dying, but these have been rejected.

The Commission on Assisted Dying, established and funded by campaigners who have been calling for a change in the law, concluded in 2012 that there was a "strong case" for allowing assisted suicide for people who are terminally ill in England and Wales.

But the medical profession and disability rights groups, among others, argue that the law should not be changed because it is there to protect the vulnerable in society.

In other countries, such as Belgium, Luxembourg and the Netherlands, legislation has been introduced to allow assisted dying. France is considering a possible introduction of similar legislation, although there is opposition from its medical ethics council. 

Campaign group Dignity in Dying predicts that a lot more countries will follow suit.

But the Archbishop of York, Dr John Sentamu, said the proposed legislation was "not about relieving pain and suffering" but was based on the misguided belief that "ending your life in circumstances of distress is an assertion of human freedom".

He told peers that his mother had been given weeks to live after being diagnosed with throat cancer but, with the help of others, had lived for a further 18 months.

"Dying well is a positive achievement of a task which belongs to our humanity," he said.

Calling for a Royal Commission to be set up to examine the issue, he added: "This is far too a complex and sensitive issue to rush through Parliament and to decide on the basis of competing personal stories."

Former High Court Judge Baroness Butler-Sloss said the proposed safeguards were "utterly inadequate" while former Tory cabinet minister Lord Tebbit said it could put pressure on people who are unable to care for themselves to "do the decent thing in order to cease to be a burden on others".

Lord Tebbit, whose wife was paralysed in the 1984 Brighton bombing, also suggested legalising assisted dying could lead to personal and financial disputes between loved ones and relatives.

"The bill would be a breeding ground for vultures, both corporate and individual. It creates too much financial incentive for the taking of life."

The BBC's parliamentary correspondent Sean Curran said the future of the legislation - and whether it ever makes it to the House of Commons - will be decided after the summer recess.

29 June 2014 Last updated at 01:19
The day a premature baby is born is the most dangerous of its life. That's when the risk of death and disability is greatest. But doctors around the world are working to help more babies survive that day.

Of the 15m premature babies born every year around the world, one million will die. 

Babies born too soon are vulnerable to infection and breathing can be difficult because of their underdeveloped lungs.  

It's not always fully understood why babies are born early - but things which increase the likelihood include the age of the mother, some infections and if the woman has already had a premature baby.    

Pre-term labour - defined as three weeks or more before the usual 40 weeks' gestation - is also higher in women from poor backgrounds, in multiple births (twins or more) or a condition called pre-eclampsia which causes high blood pressure and the only treatment is to deliver the baby.  

Malaria can also cause a baby to be born early. 

The first report on the global toll of prematurity was published just two years ago. 

Born Too Soon estimated that low-cost interventions could prevent up to three quarters of premature baby deaths each year.  

Modern medicine has helped, but the current limit of survival appears to be around 23 weeks - just over halfway through the length of a normal pregnancy.  

We've seen a fantastic progress for reducing deaths for children under five but with much less attention to newborns, particularly preterm babies”

There is a stark divide between rich and poor countries.

Two thirds of all premature births happen in just 15 countries. 

Half of premature babies born at 24 weeks in developed countries survive, whereas half of babies born in developing countries at 32 weeks will die. 

This has been dubbed the "survival gap". 

Joy Lawn, professor of maternal, reproductive and child health and director of MARCH Centre at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine is a Ugandan-born paediatrician who has worked in countries like Ghana.

She says the stubbornly high number of deaths of premature babies is limiting success in trying to achieve the fourth Millennium Development Goal - to reduce the number of deaths of children under five by two thirds. 

"We've seen a fantastic progress for reducing deaths for children under five but with much less attention to newborns, particularly preterm babies", says Prof Lawn. 

"So now 44% of child deaths globally are in the first month." 

India tops the list of countries where most premature babies are born - and 60% of deaths in under-fives are newborns.

But at Goa's Medical College in India, medics are working to reverse the trend by introducing basic measures aimed at preventing infections. 

Dr Mimi Silveira insists all visitors to the neonatal intensive care unit wash their hands thoroughly and wear aprons and indoor shoes. The staff even sterilise the babies' clothes.  

The measures appear to be helping. 

Dr Silveira says: "Five years back our mortality rate was around 14% but last year it came down to 9.2% which I think is quite good. 

"Also babies born at 28 weeks and below had a mortality rate of almost 90%. Last year we had come down to 50%."

One other low-cost method of improving the chances of premature babies is by giving their mothers corticosteroid injections - costing just 60 cents - to help mature the baby's lungs before it birth, which can halve the risk of the baby having breathing problems.  

Families often feel bewildered by the shock of a premature birth and bonding can be more difficult than with a full-term baby. 

Kangaroo care - where a baby is "worn" next to the mother's breast with direct skin-to-skin contact - helps to maintain a vulnerable baby's temperature, promotes breastfeeding and reduces the risk of infection.  

Importantly it reduces the mortality rate in stable preterm babies. 

The technique was pioneered by the Colombian doctor Edgar Rey Sanabria in the late 1970's - in response to overcrowding - there were too few incubators, so more than one baby had to be placed in each increasing the risk of infections spreading.  

Kangaroo care is now proved to save lives - helping to enable babies to gain the strength to go home more quickly. 

It also helps with bonding during those first few weeks when a hospital environment can feel strange and stressful to new parents. 

When Jo James gave birth to her daughter Molly at 28 weeks she weighed just under a kilo.

Jo had been pregnant with twins after four miscarriages. But during a 3D ultrasound scan at 24 weeks she was told that Molly's sister, Lily, had died. 

She continued to carry both babies for a further four weeks.

"But then there was no movement at all, so I thought right, I am going up [to the hospital] to get looked at.  I was in slow labour." 

Both girls were delivered by Caesarean section. 

"Lily was coming out first. If I'd gone into labour properly Lily would have come out and Molly followed - but she was too traumatised. 

"When she was born she wasn't breathing. But the doctors were brilliant. I saw her little head but it was five minutes before she breathed."

Molly was "so small there were no clothes to fit her".

Jo was unable to hold her daughter for nine days - but then tried kangaroo care.

It was "the loveliest feeling", says Jo.  

Molly, now three, only experiences minor effects after her birth says Jo.

"When she gets a cough she does get a bad chest infection. She's still on iron medicine to give her a bit of a boost, which she'll take until she's five at least."

Babies who are born very early - before 28 weeks - can often be left with lung problems, cerebral palsy and learning difficulties. 

Even babies born just a few weeks early have higher rates of hospitalisation and illness than full-term infants.  In addition to the human costs, preterm birth also costs $26 billion annually, according to the Institute of Medicine.

In the UK researchers have been following the progress of premature babies since 1995 in the EPICure study. 

Many of the common difficulties like cerebral palsy - characterised by abnormal muscle tone like spasms - have begun to reduce according to Neil Marlow, professor of neonatal medicine at University College Hospital, London and one of the principal investigators of EPICure. 

I know how helpless it feels when all you want is for your baby to be all right”

"We've seen that cerebral palsy has reduced quite dramatically over the last 10 to 15 years such that now we're beginning to see improvements for those babies who are most at risk  which are those who are born very, very prematurely" , he says.

As well as intellectual impairment, another disability which can affect very premature babies is blindness. 

Immature blood vessels at the back of the baby's eye can grow in a disorganised manner, resulting in scarring and detachment of the light-sensitive retina. 

Oxygen therapy - given to babies born early who have problems breathing - increases the risk of this happening. So careful monitoring of babies is crucial, Prof Marlow says.

"In terms of vision loss and retinopathy we've now been able to do trials which tell us exactly how much oxygen to give and how to monitor that oxygen. 

"And we think this is going to lead to a reduction further, together with some new therapies that are coming along."

Now that doctors understand more about what helps to give a premature baby the best chance of survival the next challenge - to reduce the amount of disability in the children who do survive being born early - is one which parents like Jo James will follow with interest.  

She now campaigns for the premature baby charity Bliss, along with the rest of her family.

Jo says: "Since I had Molly, all of my aunts and friends knit for me. 

"And I take hampers to the Birmingham Women's Hospital where she was born every Christmas, along with a hat and cardigan for every baby, because I know how helpless it feels when all you want is for your baby to be all right." 

Listen to The Truth About Life & Death: Prematurity on the BBC World ServiceMedia playback is unsupported on your device

18 July 2014 Last updated at 15:02 BST 

Actor Sir Patrick Stewart has joined campaigners on a march in support of assisted dying, as the House of Lords debate a new attempt to change the law.

He told the BBC that the death of his friend's partner drove him to join the campaign and he believes the law will change. Media playback is unsupported on your device

19 July 2014 Last updated at 08:20 BST 

A bill to legalise assisted dying has passed its second reading in the Lords on Friday without a vote.

Peers decided unanimously that it should be given further consideration.  

Carole Walker reports.Nearly 40 years ago, a young Belgian scientist travelled to a remote part of the Congolese rainforest - his task was to help find out why so many people were dying from an unknown and terrifying disease. 

In September 1976, a package containing a shiny, blue thermos flask arrived at the Institute of Tropical Medicine in Antwerp, Belgium.  

Working in the lab that day was Peter Piot, a 27-year-old scientist and medical school graduate training as a clinical microbiologist. 

"It was just a normal flask like any other you would use to keep coffee warm," recalls Piot, now Director of the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine. 

But this thermos wasn't carrying coffee - inside was an altogether different cargo. Nestled amongst a few melting ice cubes were vials of blood along with a note. 

It was from a Belgian doctor based in what was then Zaire, now the Democratic Republic of Congo - his handwritten message explained that the blood was that of a nun, also from Belgium, who had fallen ill with a mysterious illness which he couldn't identify. 

This unusual delivery had travelled all the way from Zaire's capital city Kinshasa, on a commercial flight, in one of the passengers' hand luggage. 

"When we opened the thermos, we saw that one of the vials was broken and blood was mixing with the water from the melted ice," says Piot. 

He and his colleagues were unaware just how dangerous that was. As the blood leaked into the icy water so too did a deadly unknown virus.

The samples were treated like numerous others the lab had tested before, but when the scientists placed some of the cells under an electron microscope they saw something they didn't expect.

"We saw a gigantic worm like structure - gigantic by viral standards," says Piot. "It's a very unusual shape for a virus, only one other virus looked like that and that was the Marburg virus."

The Marburg virus was first recognised in 1967 when 31 people became ill with haemorrhagic fever in the cities of Marburg and Frankfurt in Germany and in Belgrade, the capital of Yugoslavia. This Marburg outbreak was associated with laboratory staff who were working with infected monkeys imported from Uganda - seven people died. 

Piot knew how serious Marburg could be - but after consulting experts around the world he got confirmation that what he was seeing under the microscope wasn't Marburg - this was something else, something never seen before.

"It's hard to describe but the main emotion I had was one of real, incredible excitement," says Piot. "There was a feeling of being very privileged, that this was a moment of discovery."

News had reached Antwerp that the nun, who was under the care of the doctor in Zaire, had died. The team also learnt that many others were falling ill with this mysterious illness in a remote area in the north of the country - their symptoms included fever, diarrhoea and vomiting followed by bleeding and eventually death.

Two weeks later Piot, who had never been to Africa before, was on a flight to Kinshasa. "It was an overnight flight and I couldn't sleep. I was so excited about seeing Africa for the first time, about investigating this new virus and about stopping the epidemic."

The journey didn't end in Kinshasa - the team had to travel to the centre of the outbreak, a village in the equatorial rainforest, about 1,000km (620 miles) further north. 

"The personal physician of President Mobutu, the leader of Zaire at that time, arranged a C-130 transport aircraft for us," recalls Piot. They loaded a Landrover, fuel and all the equipment they needed on to the plane.

When the C-130 landed in Bumba, a river port situated on the northernmost point of the Congo River, the fear surrounding the mysterious disease was tangible. Even the pilots didn't want to hang around for long - they kept the airplane's engines running as the team unloaded their kit. 

"As they left they shouted 'Adieu,'" says Piot. "In French, people say 'Au Revoir' to say 'See you again', but when they say 'Adieu' - well, that's like saying, 'We'll never see you again.'"

Standing on the tarmac watching the plane leave, facing a deadly unknown virus in an unfamiliar place, some people might have regretted the decision to go there. 

"I wasn't scared. The excitement of discovery and wanting to stop the epidemic was driving everything. We heard far more people were dying from the disease than we originally thought and we wanted to get to work," Piot says.

The curiosity and sense of adventure that brought Piot to this point had been ignited many years earlier when he was a young boy growing up in a small rural village in the Flanders region of Belgium.  

A museum near Piot's home was dedicated to a local saint who worked with leprosy patients, and it was here that he got his first glimpse into the world of disease and microbiology. 

"I decided one day to cycle to the museum. The old pictures I saw there of those suffering from leprosy fascinated me," he says. "That sparked my interest in medicine - it gave me a thirst for scientific knowledge, a desire to help people and I hoped it would give me a passport to the world."

It did give Piot a passport to the world. The team's final destination was the village of Yambuku - about 120km (75 miles) from Bumba, where the plane had left them. 

Yambuku was home to an old Catholic mission - it had a hospital and a school run by a priest and nuns, all of them from Belgium. 

"The area was beautiful. The mission was surrounded by lush rainforest and the earth was red - the nature was incredibly rich but the people were so poor," says Piot. "Joseph Conrad called that place 'The Heart of Darkness', but I thought there was a lot of light there."

The beauty of Yambuku belied the horror that was unfolding for the people that lived there.  

When Piot arrived, the first people he met were a group of nuns and a priest who had retreated to a guesthouse and established their own cordon sanitaire - a barrier used to prevent the spread of disease. 

There was a sign on the cord, written in the local Lingala language that read, "Please stop, anybody who crosses here may die." 

"They had already lost four of their colleagues to the disease," says Piot. "They were praying and waiting for death."

Piot jumped over the cordon and told them that the team would help them and stop the epidemic. "When you are 27, you have all this confidence," he says. 

The nuns told the newly arrived scientists what had happened, they spoke about their colleagues and those in the village who had died and how they tried to help as best they could. 

The priority was to stop the epidemic, but first the team needed to find out how this virus was moving from person to person - by air, in food, by direct contact or spread by insects. "We had to start asking questions. It was really like a detective story," says Piot. 

These were the three questions they asked: 	

•	How did the epidemic evolve? Knowing when each person caught the virus gave clues to what kind of infection this was - from here the story of the virus began to emerge. 

•	Where did the infected people come from? The team visited all the surrounding villages and mapped out the number of infections - it was clear that the outbreak was closely related to areas served by the local hospital.

•	Who gets infected? The team found that more women than men caught the disease and particularly women between 18 and 30 years old - it turned out that many of the women in this age group were pregnant and many had attended an antenatal clinic at the hospital.

The mystery of the virus was beginning to unravel.  

The team then discovered that the women who attended the antenatal clinic all received a routine injection. Each morning, just five syringes would be distributed, the needles would be reused and so the virus was spread between the patients.

"That's how we began to figure it out," recalls Piot. "You do it by talking, looking at the statistics and using logical deduction."

The team also noticed that people were getting ill after attending funerals. When someone dies from Ebola, the body is full of the virus - any direct contact, such as washing or preparation of the deceased without protection can be a serious risk. 

The next step was to stop the transmission of the virus. 

"We systematically went from village to village and if someone was ill they would be put into quarantine," says Piot. "We would also quarantine anyone in direct contact with those infected and we would ensure everyone knew how to correctly bury those who had died from the virus."

The closure of the hospital, the use of quarantine and making sure the community had all the necessary information eventually brought an end to the epidemic - but nearly 300 people died.

Piot and his colleagues had learned a lot about the virus during three months in Yambuku, but it still lacked a name. 

"We didn't want to name it after the village, Yambuku, because it's so stigmatising. You don't want to be associated with that," says Piot.   

The team decided to name the virus after a river. They had a map of Zaire, although not a very detailed one, and the closest river they could see was the Ebola River. From that point on, the virus that arrived in a flask in Antwerp all those months earlier would be known as the Ebola virus. 

In February 2014, Piot returned to Yambuku for only the second time since 1976, to mark his 65th birthday.  He met Sukato Mandzomba, one of the few who caught the virus in 1976 and survived. "It was fantastic to meet him again, it was a very moving moment," says Piot.

Back then, Mandzomba was a nurse in the local hospital and could speak French so the pair had managed to build up a rapport. "He's still living in Yambuku and still working in the hospital - he's now running the lab there and it's impeccable. I was really impressed," Piot says.

It's 38 years since that initial outbreak and the world is now experiencing its worst Ebola epidemic ever. So far more than 600 people have died in the West African countries of Guinea, Liberia and Sierra Leone. The current situation has been called unprecedented, the spread of the disease across three countries making it more complicated to deal with than ever before. 

In the absence of any vaccine or cure, the advice for this outbreak is much the same as it was in the 1970s. "Soap, gloves, isolating patients, not reusing needles and quarantining the contacts of those who are ill - in theory it should be very easy to contain Ebola," says Piot.

In practice though, other factors can make fighting an Ebola outbreak a difficult task. People who become ill and their families may be stigmatised by the community - resulting in a reluctance to come forward for help. Cultural beliefs lead some to think the disease is caused by witchcraft, while others are hostile towards health workers.   

"We shouldn't forget that this is a disease of poverty, of dysfunctional health systems - and of distrust," says Piot. 

For this reason, information, communication and involvement of community leaders are as important as the classical medical approach, he argues. 

Ebola changed Piot's life - following the discovery of the virus, he went on to research the Aids epidemic in Africa and became the founding executive director of the UNAIDS organisation.

"It led me to do things I thought only happened in books. It gave me a mission in life to work on health in developing countries," he says.

"It was not only the discovery of a virus but also of myself."

Peter Piot spoke to World Update on the BBC World Service

Subscribe to the BBC News Magazine's email newsletter to get articles sent to your inbox.Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

18 July 2014 Last updated at 19:12 BST
Five schools, including Park View Academy, were put in special measures by Ofsted last month

A leaked report into the so-called "Trojan Horse" plot has found evidence there was an agenda to introduce "an intolerant and aggressive Islamist ethos" into some Birmingham schools.

The report, revealed in The Guardian, was ordered by the government after claims some Muslim groups were trying to take control in some schools.

The Department for Education has said it will not comment on the leaks.

Birmingham council has released its own report, disagreeing with Mr Clarke.

We must acknowledge today that Ian Kershaw's report shows we have serious governance issues in a small number of schools in east Birmingham because of serious malpractice by members of governing bodies. This has been compounded by the inability of head teachers and other governors to counter this behaviour and by the failure of the city council to intervene to instil proper governance. 

The government's report was compiled by retired senior police officer Peter Clarke, the former head of the Met Police's counter-terrorism unit. It is due to be published next week.

It says he found evidence of "sustained and co-ordinated agenda to impose upon children in a number of Birmingham schools the segregationist attitudes and practices of a hardline and politicised strain of Sunni Islam".

He also found evidence of a "co-ordinated, deliberate and sustained action to introduce an intolerant and aggressive Islamist ethos into some schools in the city".

The agenda would have confined "schoolchildren within an intolerant, inward-looking monoculture that would severely inhibit their participation in the life of modern Britain," the leaked report says.

A spokesman for the DfE said: "The allegations made in relation to some schools in Birmingham are very serious and we are investigating all evidence put to us in conjunction with Ofsted and Birmingham City Council."

Russell Hobby, general secretary of the National Association of Head Teachers, said his union was disturbed by the Clarke review findings but not surprised. 

They reflected concerns raised in May about improper governance and staffing and "a narrowing of entitlement for children", he said.

"We do not need an over-reaction. This is not a criticism of the Islamic faith, but of a narrow current within it," he said.

Birmingham's report, compiled by former head teacher Ian Kershaw, differed in its conclusions.

It said there was "no evidence of a conspiracy to promote an anti-British agenda, violent extremism or radicalisation in schools" in the east of the city. 

Mr Kershaw did find "key individuals" promoting Islamic principles in schools and "noted a pattern of these individuals moving between schools". 

He did not conclude whether the original "Trojan Horse" letter was a hoax, as has been claimed. 

We do not need an over-reaction. This is not a criticism of the Islamic faith, but of a narrow current within it.”

But he found evidence that the "five steps" outlined in the original letter as a means of destabilising school leadership were "present in a large number of the schools considered part of the investigation".

His report said evidence pointed to a group of "British male governors and teachers, predominantly of Pakistani heritage", which have formed in order to address perceived failings in some schools. 

Mr Kershaw said the tactics employed by these groups were often "improper" and there was a "pattern" to their behaviour but it stopped short of a widespread plot. 

He said their motivation seemed to be an attempt to "raise standards" based on a "genuine and understandable desire...to improve education and opportunities for Muslim pupils.

"The evidence is not sufficient to lead me to construe the behaviour to be a co-ordinated plan to improperly influence the direction or management of schools serving students of predominantly Islamic faith or background," he said. 

Mr Kershaw also says Birmingham City Council was "slow to respond" to allegations in the letter and accused education chiefs in the city of "poor oversight". 

He identifies a "culture within [the council] of not wanting to address difficult issues and problems with school governance" for risk of bringing accusations of racism or Islamophobia. 

Speaking at a press conference earlier, Council leader Sir Albert Bore admitted the council failed to act for fear of being seen as racist or Islamophobic. 

Last month, Ofsted and the Education Funding Agency published their reports and five schools were placed in special measures as a result.

The schools involved have always denied any wrongdoing.

On Tuesday, the board of trustees resigned at Park View Education Trust, which has been at the centre of claims, stating they had been the victims of a "co-ordinated and vicious" attack. 

The trust has been the focus of allegations made in the anonymous Trojan Horse letter alleging the existence of a clique of hardline Muslims attempting to seize control of Birmingham schools.  The origin of the letter and the intentions behind it have never been determined.

17 July 2014 Last updated at 14:26
The chairman of governors at a Bradford school has hit back after an Ofsted report said pupils were not being protected from the risks of extremism.

The report recommended Carlton Bolling College be placed in special measures.

Faisal Khan said it was one of the few schools in Bradford working with the government's counter-terrorism initiative, Prevent.

He denied claims it only met the needs of Muslim students and restricted Religious Education to Islamic studies.

Mr Khan said: "As far we understand, we were working with Prevent and doing some good work."

The education watchdog report, which has not been published, rated the school's leadership as "inadequate". 

Mr Khan called the findings "completely false". 

Ofsted declined to respond to Mr Khan until the report is published. 

A high proportion of the 1,500 students at Carlton Bolling are of minority ethnic heritage. The largest groups are of Pakistani and Bangladeshi heritage.

A small proportion of the pupils are classed as "white British" and a small but increasing minority are of eastern European heritage.

The report said governors met the needs of Muslim students, but did not take sufficient account of other faiths.

"The reality... is exactly the opposite to what it says in the report. All religions are taught," Mr Khan said. 

"We don't just meet the needs of our Muslim children, we also need to meet the needs of our eastern European children, [which is] a growing student population.

"We have employed staff with specialist skills in eastern European languages.

"I think [Ofsted] need to explain themselves."

The report said there was "deep-rooted disagreement and distrust" between the school's governors and inspectors were told Mr Khan shouted aggressively when he heard views contrary to his own.

Mr Khan said: "It wasn't an inspection, it was more like an inquisition. 

"This has put me off governorship. I spent the last eight years trying to improve educational attainment for children in the area I come from. 

"It feels very personal." 

Bradford Council said it had asked the Department for Education for permission to put in place an interim executive board to replace the governing body.

The report comes a month after the BBC learnt teachers in Bradford claimed some governors were promoting a more Islamic ethos.

16 July 2014 Last updated at 16:22
Parents of the schoolgirls abducted by militant Islamists in Nigeria have denied playing politics by refusing to meet President Goodluck Jonathan. 

Tuesday's meeting failed to take place because proper protocol had not been followed, their spokesman said. 

Mr Jonathan said the parents had called off the meeting after being manipulated by the #BringBackOurGirls campaign group. 

Boko Haram captured more than 200 girls in the town of Chibok on 14 April.

The row broke out as the alleged mastermind of a twin bomb attack in Nigeria's capital, Abuja, was extradited from Sudan back to Nigeria.

Aminu Sadiq Ogwuche was reportedly arrested in Khartoum in May after Interpol issued an arrest warrant.

He is accused of planning the Nyanya bus station bombings earlier this year, which killed 75 people. 

Boko Haram said it carried out the bombings.

Mr Jonathan declared a state of emergency in three north-eastern states last year to quell the insurgency, but Boko Haram has stepped up attacks since then. 

It caused an international outcry in April when it abducted the girls. 

#BringBackOurGirls was a global campaign launched on social media to secure their release.

Mr Jonathan was widely criticised for failing to meet distraught parents and not doing enough to rescue the girls. 

On Monday, he agreed to meet  12 parents and five girls who escaped shortly after being seized by Boko Haram, following a request by Pakistani rights campaigner Malala Yousafzai.

Chibok community spokesman Dauda Iliya said the proposed meeting had been organised in a hurry, so there was not time to consult with all the parents.

Chibok residents were "very traumatised" and people had lost trust in each other, he said.

If a small number of parents suddenly announced they had met the president, they would have a "hard time" from the others, and there might be a "suspicion that money had changed hands", Mr Iliya said.

The decision had "nothing" to do with the #BringBackOurGirls campaign group, he told BBC Focus on Africa.

"We are in pain. We can't bear any animosity to the government," Mr Iliya said. 

He added that the president should visit to see for himself the "level of destruction" in the area, or failing that, another meeting could be organised properly.

Mr Jonathan said "political forces" in the #BringBackOurGirls campaign group derailed the meeting.

The lobby group has also denied having any influence in the decision not to meet the president.

Nigeria is due to hold presidential elections next year.   

Mr Jonathan has not yet declared his candidature, but speculation is rife that he intends to run for another term. 

He launched a fund to help those affected by the Boko Haram insurgency on Wednesday, urging the public to donate money. 

More than three million people are facing a humanitarian crisis because of the conflict, according to the government's relief agency.

On Monday, about  45 people were killed following fighting in Dille village in north-eastern Borno state, residents told the BBC.

Local vigilantes fought back after Boko Haram raided the village, killing 20 of the attackers, residents said. 

About 25 villagers were also killed by Boko Haram and the Nigerian military, they added. 

A military jet flew over the village some five hours after Boko Haram's raid, opening fire and killing civilians, residents said. 

The military has not commented on the allegation. 

18 July 2014 Last updated at 21:28
A sea eagle chick, featured on BBC Springwatch, which was seen being pushed out of the nest by an intruder eagle has successfully flown the nest.

The young chick, which fell 30ft, was seen via webcam being shoved out of the Mull nest by another bird - behaviour never recorded in Scotland before.

It was returned to the nest by Forestry Commission Scotland (FCS) rangers.

Worried viewers noticed the nest empty again but it was confirmed that the chick fledged successfully on Thursday.

The three-month old was seen perched in nearby woodland and was flying strongly.

Dave Sexton, the RSPB's Mull officer, who has been monitoring the nest, said: "We were initially concerned as there was no sign of the chick and I couldn't hear her either which was unusual.

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Video shows a sea eagle raid on another nest

"But I'm delighted and relieved to say that she'd already flown some distance from the nest and I eventually found her sitting on top of a tree stump surveying the view around her.

"Her father was watching from nearby. From her new vantage point she could see Ben More to the south, Coll and Tiree to the west and Rum  to the north.

"We wish her well as she starts her new life exploring the length and breadth of Scotland."

He added: "The webcam has allowed viewers from around the globe to share the secret world of sea eagles and to have a window on to Mull. 

"It's been a fantastic success and now with a very happy ending, or should I say beginning?"

The Mull Eagle Watch project is a partnership between FCS, RSPB, Scottish Natural Heritage, Police Scotland and the Mull & Iona Community Trust.

19 July 2014 Last updated at 11:10
At least six passengers who died on board the crashed Malaysia Airlines plane were travelling to a major international Aids conference.

They include Prof Joep Lange - a prominent and popular researcher and a former president of the International Aids Society (IAS).

IAS said they would have "truly lost a giant".

Delegates who have already arrived at the conference in Australia said they were in "total shock". 

Early reports suggested that at least 100 delegates had been killed, but that figure has now been revised to six.

They were named by the IAS as Pim de Kuijer, Lucie van Mens, Maria Adriana de Schutter, Glenn Thomas, Joep Lange and his partner Jacqueline van Tongeren.

"The extent of our loss is hard to comprehend or express," said IAS President  Francoise Barre-Sinoussi. "We grieve alongside all of those throughout the world who have lost friends and family in this senseless tragedy."

More than 14,000 scientists, campaigners and politicians are meeting at the Aids 2014 conference in Melbourne.

Joep Lange was a professor of medicine at the University of Amsterdam and has been involved in HIV research since the virus emerged in the 1980s.

He trialled antiretroviral therapies, which have transformed HIV into a manageable disease.

He also worked on preventing the virus passing from mother to child during pregnancy and labour.

Prof Lange is described as a leader in his field and between 2002 and 2004 was president of the International Aids Society.

Prof Peter Riess, who also worked at the University of Amsterdam, told the BBC: "Joep was a close colleague and friend of mine. Everyone here in Melbourne is in total shock at what happened.

"In the early eighties when this strange new disease hit Amsterdam, both Joep and I were training at the time and were confronted with this new disease which then went on to shape our scientific and medical careers.

"He's been really involved from the very beginning."

The plane, carrying 298 people, crashed in rebel-held territory in eastern Ukraine on Thursday. 

Dr Jeremy Farrar who leads the Wellcome Trust medical research charity said he was "deeply saddened" by the deaths on flight MH17.

"Joep was a great clinical scientist, and a great friend of the Wellcome Trust who has long been a valued adviser. 

"He was also a personal friend. He is a great loss to global health research."

Zoya Shabarova, an adviser for the Aids Healthcare Foundation, was flying to the conference via Hong Kong.

She told the BBC: "It's a really terrible loss, unbelievable, he was a person with such a big heart. My colleagues and I, we can't comprehend this, it's a terrible loss to the HIV programme, the people, the patients. 

"I want to send deep condolences to his family and all those on the flight." 

Speaking about the loss of another delegate, Glenn Thomas, of the World Health Organization, WHO spokeswoman Fadela Chaib said: "For the time being we would like to give his family time to grieve. 

"We have lost a wonderful person and a great professional. Our hearts are broken. We are all in shock."

"The global HIV community is a close community - standing up for non-violence, dignity and human rights. People will be devastated - but I am sure everyone will pull together and continue to fight the AIDS epidemic.

16 July 2014 Last updated at 18:10
Professor Stephen Hawking:"I think everyone should have the right to choose to end their life"

Cambridge scientist Stephen Hawking is backing the Assisted Dying Bill which is being debated by peers on Friday.

The 72-year-old cosmologist said it was "discrimination against the disabled to deny them the right to kill themselves that able bodied people have."

He said safeguards would be needed to ensure the person truly wanted to die.

Lord Falconers's bill proposes allowing doctors to prescribe a lethal dose to terminally ill patients judged to have less than six months to live.

I briefly tried to commit suicide by not breathing.  However, the reflex to breathe was too strong”

More than 130 peers have put their names down to speak. 

The Bill would enable doctors to help patients die by prescribing a lethal dose of drugs.

Two physicians would have to certify that the patient was terminally ill and expected to die within six months.

Prof Hawking said it would be "wrong to despair and commit suicide, unless one is in great pain, but that is a matter of choice.

"We should not take away the freedom of the individual to choose to die."

But he admitted that he had once briefly tried to end his life when he had a tracheostomy - an operation to fit a breathing tube. 

"I briefly tried to commit suicide by not breathing.  However, the reflex to breathe was too strong."


14 July 2014 Last updated at 10:06
This interview with Prof Hawking is part of the wider coverage of the differing views on this issue running on BBC News this week in the run-up to the debate. Dolphin attacks on porpoises in Cardigan Bay have left marine scientists scratching their heads.

Three out of four attacks by bottlenose dolphins noted in recent weeks by volunteers from New Quay-based Cardigan Bay Marine Wildlife Centre were fatal.

Science officer Sarah Perry said such attacks are not unknown but it was rare to see it happening in Cardigan Bay.

The centre suggested the attacks may be over competition for food or the result of dolphin mating behaviour.

It said scientists have always known that dolphins attack porpoises but the frequency of recent attacks is a real puzzle.

Although we were close by, they took no notice of us, intent on the attack”

In May, volunteers at the centre (CBMWC) in Ceredigion rescued a porpoise that stranded on the beach after being chased by dolphins. 

Last month researchers saw three dolphins killing a porpoise, with another similar incident a week later. 

Then last week three dolphins spent 20 minutes attacking a porpoise close to the centre's research vessel Anna Lloyd.

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Sarah Perry, from Cardigan Bay Marine Wildlife Centre in New Quay, Ceredigion, spoke to BBC Radio Wales

They repeatedly pounced on the porpoise, forcing it underwater then throwing it in the air close to the boat.

Researcher Milly Metcalfe said: "One of the dolphins in particular was attacking the porpoise while the others joined in from time to time.

"Although we were close by, they took no notice of us, intent on the attack."

The crew brought the porpoise's body on board and found blood was coming from its mouth, suggesting it may have had punctured lungs or other internal injuries, she said.

Ms Perry said the centre had been left baffled by the recent spate of these attacks.

She said: "One possibility is that they see the porpoises as competitors for food, especially if there's a shortage of prey in the area.

"Although porpoises normally go for smaller prey, dolphins will eat anything. However there's been no other indication recently of any shortage."

Another theory is low numbers of females is prompting the attacks by males.

Male dolphins have been known to kill young dolphins in order to mate with the calf's mother. Porpoises are similar in size to a dolphin calf.

The centre said it is unclear which dolphins have been responsible for the attacks. 

Mr Perry added: "One animal we're familiar with, Nick, a female, was seen in the area when we rescued the porpoise last month, and she was also seen nearby in last week's attack.

"Our records show that she's been seen before with the animals we think were responsible for the attack, so it may even be that she's teaching the others." 

18 July 2014 Last updated at 00:25

There has been a dramatic rise in reports of child abuse images posted to commonly used parts of the internet, according to a US watchdog.

They include photos posted to publicly-accessible parts of social networks.

The National Center for Missing and Exploited Children received a record number of reports in the first week of July, four times the weekly average.

It comes in a week UK authorities arrested 660 people in connection with online child abuse.

That investigation was believed to have been targeted at those using the so-called "dark net" - parts of the internet that are hidden and can be hard to access without special software.

Any type of platform that allows people to post images or videos - they get used for the wrong reasons”

But the NCMEC stressed there was still a significant and growing challenge for law enforcement agencies to deal with material on the open internet as well as the harder-to-reach areas.

In the US, all electronic communications providers (ECPs) have had to report any instance of child abuse on their networks to the Cyber Tipline provided by the NCMEC since 1998.

Since many of the world's most popular communications sites, such as Facebook, Twitter and Pinterest, are based in the US, the NCMEC works with authorities around the world to follow up leads provided by tips.

The UK is among the 62 countries working closely with the NCMEC.

In the week from beginning 29 June and ending July 5, 92,800 reports were made to the Cyber Tipline.

Of those, the vast majority - 91,334 - came from internet firms, with the remainder being tip-offs from members of the public.

On average, the NCMEC receives around 15,000 reports per week. 

John Shehan, executive director of the NCMEC Exploited Children Division, said the large numbers early in July may prove to be an anomaly.

But he stressed the growing concern with social networks.

"You wouldn't think someone would do it on Pinterest or LinkedIn," Mr Shehan said.

"But any type of platform that allows people to post images or videos - they get used for the wrong reasons."

While most would assume social networks are an unlikely place for illegal material to be shared - by people who would presumably want to hide any trace of their identity - Mr Shehan said several theories had emerged.

"When you look at the types of offenders who have a sexual interest in children, there is a wide spectrum as far as their internet knowledge, and their backgrounds with being able to anonymise and hide their identities online.

"If you look at where the content is being uploaded from - sometimes we see that it goes back to third-world countries.

"Some of these are just starting to get high-speed internet access, and they may not be as sophisticated as some countries in using different anonymisers."

660

suspected paedophiles arrested

431

children have been protected

39 suspects were registered sex offenders

833 buildings searched
                

9,172 devices, including phones and laptops, seized

The BBC contacted the leading social networks that report into the NCMEC.

All stressed that the latest technology - which is able to spot known images of child abuse and flag authorities immediately - was deployed across the sites.

LinkedIn confirmed that reports about child abuse had been made to the NCMEC, but that instances were extremely rare.

Twitter, which is the subject of a campaign by internet activist group Anonymous to do more to quickly remove child abuse images, said it had a no-tolerance approach.

A spokesman said: "When we are made aware of links to images of or content promoting child sexual exploitation they will be removed from the site without further notice and reported to the NCMEC, we permanently suspend accounts promoting or containing updates with links to child sexual exploitation."

In the UK, there is no law that compels UK communications companies to inform the Cyber Tipline, or any similar service, about child abuse content discovered on their services.

In a statement to the BBC, the NCA said: "The UK internet industry is very small in comparison to the US and no such equivalent legislation currently exists.

"UK internet service providers voluntarily block access to known indecent images of children."

Please turn on JavaScript. Media requires JavaScript to play.

Phil Gormley, NCA: "We are not going to simply arrest our way out of this problem"

The Internet Watch Foundation (IWF) - the UK-based group that actively targets illegal content online - said that while it would be interesting to see the effects a US-style law would have, the UK's impressive record in stamping out child abuse meant existing rules were working.

"Due to the cooperation we have with the online industry in the UK less than 1% of child sexual abuse imagery is hosted here, down from 18% in 1996," said Susie Hargreaves, the IWF's chief executive.

Ms Hargreaves re-iterated the concerns of the the NCMEC that child abuse images were increasingly being spread on the open internet as well as the dark web.

"This isn't a problem which is only found in hidden areas of the internet," she told the BBC.

Within a year, the IWF had just four full-time analysts working on monitoring the internet.

"We now have 12 analysts who are still working full time and due to our ability to proactively seek out the images and videos, we're able to identify around three times as many URLs as last year."

21 July 2014 Last updated at 16:28
Two boys, who were kept in Russia by their father in breach of a family court order, have been returned to their mother in London. 

Rachael Neustadt, from Hendon, said Ilya Neustadt took their two sons on holiday in December 2012 then refused to hand them back to her. 

At a High Court hearing Mr Justice Peter Jackson was told by lawyers that the brothers had been found in Moscow.

Ms Neustadt said she was "thrilled and relieved" that the boys were home.  

 "We have so much to catch up on and so many hugs to make up for," she said.

"I am infinitely grateful to everyone for their help and prayers."

Ms Neustadt was the primary carer of Daniel, eight, and his brother Jonathan, six, when her former husband failed to return them to her care, the hearing in the Family Division of the High Court heard.

She began legal action and a High Court judge ordered that Mr Neustadt return the children to England, but he failed to comply.

Ms Neustadt, a former teacher from the US, went on to win a landmark ruling in Moscow City Appeal Court in November.

The Russian court said that her sons had been illegally kept in Russia in breach of a UK High Court order.

The case was the first to successfully use the 1996 Hague Convention on child abduction in England and Russia, which Russia ratified in June and the UK signed last year. 

Ms Neustadt's lawyers said the boys had been found in an apartment with their paternal grandmother. 

The Russian authorities had overseen their collection and handover in accordance with court orders, the court heard. 

21 July 2014 Last updated at 01:59
A Southfield, Michigan, woman who was convicted of shooting her lover over a suspected affair could be released.

Sadie Bell, 58, admitted that she shot Edward Lee in the stomach last year because, as prosecutor Paul Walton explained, "he wasn’t producing enough ejaculate.”

Bell, who was convicted in April, has been granted a $10,000 bond and is due to be released as soon as she posts it, CBS Detroit reports.

Prosecutors have appealed the ruling.

"She stated that she knew he was having an affair because he wasn’t producing enough ejaculate,” Walton told CBS Detroit. “She also said to the police some very graphic things about how she expected him to perform, she was a cheap date, she liked sex, she expected him to be able to do what he’s promised; and she said, in essence, to quote her, she was pissed off, so she shot him.”

It is rare for people convicted of crimes to be released while their appeals are heard, Click On Detroit reports. Usually they remain behind bars during that process.

Court documents obtained by the Detroit Free Press say Bell shot her ex-husband in 1991, but was never charged. The man survived the attack.

Lee was hospitalized after the shooting and is still in recovery.


21 July 2014 Last updated at 1:59
This toy ain't for tots.
Misty Ann Lee, 38, was buzzted after allegedly trying to steal a vibrator from a Spencer's gift shop in Spartanburg, South Carolina by hiding the sex toy behind her child in a stroller, according to GoUpstate.com.

Lee went into Sepncer's Friday afternoon, stroller in tow, and picked up "a vibrator from the love unit," according to a police report obtained by The Smoking Gun. The store manager told police that she watched Lee "slide the vibrator behind a young child in the stroller."

When the manager confronted Lee, Lee allegedly claimed she had no idea what she was talking about, but found herself on shaky ground after the manager pulled the vibrator out of the stroller. Lee left, but returned to the store later, which is when the manager called the cops.


18 July 2014 Last updated at 11:59
A woman in Houston, Texas has been shot by a mugger after refusing to hand over her Samsung Galaxy Smartphone.

The woman, who is only known as Courtney, was approached by the man who then told her to hand over the phone or be shot.

In a moment of brave stupidity Courtney refused to hand over the smartphone, getting onto her knees and holding her hands above her head.
The mugger then shot then woman but incredibly the bullet only grazed the side of her head. She then ran into a friends house who was nearby and the mugger turned tail and ran.

With smartphones costing upwards of £600-800 it's understandable for people to place a very high value on them, and that's before you start counting the potential sentimental value that comes with the content inside it.

For Courtney however these factors were so important that for a split second, she made the decision to take the risk.

That said, any assessment of the 'blame' for this poor woman getting shot has to focus mainly on the mugger with the gun. We're not sure claiming she "chose to be shot" is quite the way Courtney would have put it.

18 July 2014 Last updated at 12:13
There are very few crimes which provoke such powerful emotions as child sexual abuse.

The predatory paedophiles who commit these vile and abhorrent offences destroy the lives of their vulnerable victims for their own depraved gratification. It is a stain on civilised society, and one this government is absolutely determined to remove.

For the vast majority of us, the innocence of childhood is joyous and sacrosanct. But sadly we know there are those who get a perverted pleasure from viewing images depicting the sort of sick crimes no one should have to suffer or see.

And in this age of the internet, it has never been easier for those images to be shared. There are millions of pictures of appalling abuse online, many being circulated on networks through which their users seek to protect their anonymity and avoid detection.

The National Crime Agency has been working to disrupt this activity and bring those involved to justice. It was announced yesterday that this six-month operation has safeguarded hundreds of children and resulted in 660 arrests.

The NCA's unique and unprecedented capability to co-ordinate law enforcement efforts has been invaluable, as has the expertise provided by the Child Exploitation and Online Protection Command.

There is, of course, much still to do. But this government is taking decisive action to stamp out child sexual exploitation.

That is why we have set up a Home Office-led National Group, through which agencies are working together to better identify those at risk and create a more victim-focused culture within the police, health and children's services.

Alongside the NCA, police forces are actively tackling this issue as evidenced by the increasing number of these cases the police are bringing before the courts and the significant sentences being handed down to perpetrators.

We have also established the UK-US taskforce to counter online child exploitation, through which we are drawing on the brightest and best minds from across industry, law enforcement and academia to stop the internet being used to abuse children.

Google and Microsoft have already made changes to their search engines to prevent images, videos or pathways to child abuse being returned from a blacklist of search terms, making it harder for offenders to find this appalling material.

In addition, we are committed to developing a single, secure database of all illegal images seized by the police and the NCA.

This will help officers work more effectively together to close the net on paedophiles and ensure internet companies can better identify, block and remove illegal images.

Never before will law enforcement agencies have been so well equipped to prevent abuse in the first place, detect it where it is happening, identify and protect victims and bring offenders to justice.

The Child Abuse Image Database will be up and running by the end of the year.

Government action and operations such as this one led by the NCA are sending the message loud and clear - child sexual abuse must stop, and we will do everything we can to end it.

17/07/2014 14:41 BST Updated: 17/07/2014 14:59
An invasive and banned “test” for homosexuality is reportedly still being used in Lebanon.

The examination, which involves the insertion of a metal egg-shaped metal object into the rectum, was carried out on five men accused of being gay, Lebanon’s Daily Star writes.

Being gay is a criminal offence in Lebanon. The men were not suspected of any other offences.

The newspaper writes the doctor who performed the tests was hired by the judicial police’s Moral Protection Bureau.

Nizar Saghieh, the lawyer and editor of the Legal Agenda journal, said he has asked the Lebanese Order of Physicians to sue the doctor for professional misconduct.

The group had earlier forbidden doctors from conducting the examination deeming it to constitute “torture”, Al Bawaba writes.

SEE ALSO: Indonesian Education Official Proposes Virginity Tests For Female High School Students
It said: “Such techniques do not give the desired result and constitute a gross violation of the rights of persons who are subject to it without their consent. ... The practice is humiliating and is torture in violation of the [United Nations] Convention Against Torture.”

It is believed to be the first use of the test since a well-publicised case involving 35 men detained in a raid at an adult cinema in Burj Hammoud in July 2012, The Independent reports.

The raid sparked fierce criticism, with Lebanese Justice Minister Shakib Qortbawi describing the tests as “totally unacceptable” from a “humanitarian point of view”.

Lebanon does not explicitly outlaw homosexuality, but Article 534 of the penal code states that "sexual intercourse contrary to nature" is punishable by up to one year in prison, according to Helem, the first openly gay rights group operating in the region. The organisation says that Article 534 is used by the Lebanese ruling classes to criminalise homosexuality.

In August 2012, Human Rights Watch appealed to the government to repeal article 534.

A spokesman said: “Forensic anal examinations of men suspected of homosexual contact, conducted in detention, constitute degrading and humiliating treatment

“These ‘tests of shame,’ as Lebanese rights organization the Legal Agenda has dubbed them, should stop immediately – the state has no business punishing and degrading its citizens for consensual sexual conduct.”

17 July 2014 Last updated at 11:56
We have previously written on the theory that the universe is a computer simulation. But while that is actually less of a thought experiment than you might assume, it's possible to take it too literally.

That appears to be the case with Christopher Leyshon, 28, who is alleged to have tried to stab at policemen in Cinderford because he thought the world was an "alien computer simulation".

The officers were called because the man had apparently threatened to cut off the head of the family cat. The court heard that Leyshon locked himself inside the house and then emerged with a 12-inch knife while attempting to "stab out" at the police.

Gloucester Crown Court heard that Leyshon believed the officers to be computer graphics and were not real

Consultant psychiatrist Dr John Sandford told a jury Leyshon suffered from severe schizophrenia and "a loss of contact with reality" according to the Gloucester Citizen.

"When the incident occurred he either did not know the nature or the quality of the act or if he did know he did not know that it was wrong.

“Regarding the defendant’s use of cannabis even without the use of the drug there was a significant risk of him developing the symptoms of schizophrenia.”


16 July 2014 Last updated at 16:59
A man has been charged with threatening and disorderly conduct after an incident involving… a watermelon.

Carmine Cervellino, of Connecticut, was arrested after his wife complained to police that he had left a watermelon on their kitchen countertop with a large butcher knife sticking out of it.

Cervellino then walked into the room and began stabbing the fruit in what police described as a “passive aggressive” manner, the Register Citizen reports.

watermelon knife

Say it with fruit... but don't say this

The 49-year-old was accused of resorting to the tactics to “intimidate her because he is angry with her,” it said in the police report.

The New York Post reports that the wife, whom it names as Carol, had earlier told police she had found marijuana and drugs in his toolbox. 

A police investigation found no evidence and Cervellino faces no drugs charges.

He is on bail after posting a $500 bond.


16 July 2014 Last updated at 11:59
A major sex crime crackdown has led to the arrest of 660 suspected paedophiles across Britain, the National Crime Agency (NCA) has said.

The six-month operation targeted internet users who access child abuse images but has already led to charges for serious sexual assault.

Among the several hundred people arrested across England, Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland are workers who had access to children through their jobs and had no previous contact with police.

The massive investigation, involving 45 police forces, led to hundreds of children being "safeguarded", the NCA said.

It stressed that none of those arrested is a serving or former MP or member of the Government.

The NCA said suspects include doctors, teachers, Scout leaders, care workers and former police officers. In total, only 39 registered sex offenders are among those arrested.

Officers have searched 833 properties and examined 9,172 computers, phones and hard drives.

The NCA said it built up "intelligence packages" on suspects and sent them to police forces across Britain.

The "dark web" is internet content that is not listed by normal search engines. Users will often use payment methods such as virtual currencies to help avoid detection.

The 431 children who were safeguarded were in the "care, custody or control" of the suspects, and included 127 who were deemed to be at immediate risk of harm.

Gormley said he was "profoundly disappointed" that so many suspects had been arrested over this type of crime, and said a harder look needs to be taken at the high numbers of people accessing child abuse images.

He said: "The alternative is not to look under the stone, and we cannot afford not to look under this stone."

Claire Lilley, head of online safety at the NSPCC, said: "This is an important two-pronged operation which has rescued children from abuse and also identified many previously unknown sex offenders. Direct action like this sends a strong message to those who subject children to harrowing sexual assaults that they can and will be traced and prosecuted.

"But law enforcement agencies alone cannot deal with the vast problem of illegal images which continue to flood the market. Industry has to find inventive ways of blocking the flow of such horrendous pictures which are only produced through the suffering of defenceless children - many of who are not even old enough to go to school.

"So while this operation must be rightly applauded we should view it as yet another warning sign that far more needs to be done if we are to stem the sordid trade in these images, which are often used by those who go on to abuse children."


15 July 2014 Last updated at 12:59
If you don't know what you're doing, then tackling a litter-lout is a most depressing business. At the very least, you're going to be abused. You'll probably be sworn at and you may even be showered in spittle, as happened to the TV presenter Nicky Campbell.
But here's what I know: with just a little practice, dealing with litter-louts can be a truly rewarding experience. Hell - it's way better than that. It's THRILLING! It can perk up your whole day.
And all it takes is some chutzpah and just a bit of brains. You've got to be smart. And what that means is... You've got to pick your battles.
I really, really hate litter-louts. But that does not mean that I'm charging in willy-nilly against every creep who tosses a crisp packet into the gutter. No way! I might get beaten up! I might get knifed!
So if it came to taking on five or six teenagers who were kicking around bags of rubbish - as happened to my dear old running buddy Nicky - then I think it'd probably be best to keep your mouth shut. Not that it's impossible to win against a group of kids. But it's difficult. I'll come back to this later.
The one thing you've got to get firmly in your head is that litter-louts are, well... LOUTS. They are yobs. They do not deserve courtesy or genteel manners. What they in fact deserve is a bucket of shit in the face.
And I'm the guy who's giving it to them.
Now, I am generally very polite. Doors being held open: I'm your man. 'Pleases' and 'Thank yous' - I love those too. You will not find a perkier little sunbeam than me; I am a very model of deportment.
However: when it comes to litter-louts, the good manners have to take a back-seat.
And then, for a little while, this vituperative New York cabbie seems to take control. It is just great!
But, just like everything else, it takes practice. The more you do it, the better you'll get.
Here's how it's done.
A couple of days back, I'm walking home with my nine-year-old son Geordie. We're on Edinburgh's Royal Mile, it's a fantastically sunny day, and then this crumpled fag packet is tossed right in front of me.
I look to see who's thrown it, and it's a scrawny guy in his 40s, shaven headed, black leathers, a little bit grungy. He's sitting on a bench with his girlfriend and he is, of all things, transferring his cigarettes into a silver cigarette case.
I stoop down and pick up the cigarette packet. "Hey - you want this back?" I say.
"No, you can keep it," says the guy as he languidly reverts to his little cigarette case.
Without even breaking stride, I fired an absolutely zinging shot at him. The cigarette packet pinged nicely off the top of his shiny head.
The lout looks up, slightly surprised.
And then I give it to him. And this is what you've got to do with litter louts - get the abuse in first. They're louts. They're going to swear at you! So go for the pre-emptive strike: abuse them first!
"Have your litter back, you bald bloody lout!" I said - and by now, I'm walking on. As to the actual fag packet - well I don't know what happened to that. It doesn't really matter. The general principle is not necessarily to clean up this single piece of litter. What you're doing is sticking it to the litter-louts. Believe me, it is the only thing that will ever make them think twice about littering in the future.
By now I've walked on a few yards.
The lout calls out to me. "Hey - just chill, man!" he says.
This jerk wants me to "just chill"? Well there are a lot of things I could have said to that - but here's the second point about dealing with litter-louts. You do not engage. You give them one stinging insult, which preferably includes something about their appearance - their hair, their spots, their clothes - and then you walk on.
And that should have been that - should have been that. Except Geordie then decides to step into the fray. My nine-year-old turns to the guy and does that thing that you do to gurgling babies - he flicks his lips with his finger and goes "Bibble-bibble-bibble."
The bald litter-lout is out for the count - floored by a nine-year-old!
But I'd picked my battle. If this guy had been some huge beef-cake, then I'd probably have thought twice. If we hadn't been on the very busy Royal Mile, then that might also have given me pause for thought. But as it was... I could take the guy on with impunity.
The first time you try it, it feels deeply unnatural. For probably the first time in your life, you are swearing at a complete stranger. Second time, it gets easier. And by the fifth time... it can really put a spring in your stride. Soon you'll be licking your lips at the prospect of tackling your next litter-lout. 
Here's another cracking example of how to deal with litter-louts. This is an absolute beauty. Works every single time. 
It's what you do with people who chuck litter out of their cars. Now Nicky Campbell has also had some experience of this one. He had a go remonstrating with some woman who'd thrown a couple of bags out of her car window. Nicky went up to the driver and asked her what sort of example she was setting to her kids; she drove off without even a backward glance.
Nicky! Nicky, Nicky, Nicky! What you did was admirable. But this is not the way to deal with litter-louts. They're louts! So give it them both barrels.
The first time I took on a litter-lout driver was about two years ago just outside the Balmoral Hotel in the centre of Edinburgh. I was on my bike, waiting at the lights, and just in front of me was a man in a white van.
As he waited for the lights to turn green, he decided to have a little clear out. He started tossing all this stuff out of the window - paper, fag packets, fast-food wrappers, all the usual junk.
I pedalled up alongside him, picked up the rubbish and then hurled the whole lot right back through the window and into the van. And this time, since I wasn't with Geordie, I didn't even have to tone down my language: "Have your shit back, you f***ing lout!"
Job done, I quietly pedalled on my way (though admittedly keeping a wary eye out for the van-driver just in case he tried to run me over). 
So let me repeat. There is no point whatsoever in giving litter-louts your calm, soothing voice of reason. Forget it! You must be mad! You'll just get a volley of abuse, and it will leave you all steamed up for the rest of the day.
But if you give it to them... well firstly they're going to be a little bit stunned. In all their years of littering, nobody's ever done this to them before.
And secondly... it's a brilliant way of venting. Most days, most weeks, we spend our lives being the human sponges that we are, soaking it up and generally fuming.
But sticking it to a litter-lout is the PERFECT opportunity to blow your top. Just the one choice insult and the one swear-word, mind. Remember: DO NOT ENGAGE! Insult them - and walk on by.
Now, finally, here's how to deal with a gang of litter-louts. This is not at all easy - but, very occasionally, if the circumstances are right, you can stick it to them.
A while back, I was on my bike (again) in Edinburgh, and these four louts, teenagers, were kicking a bag of rubbish around on the pavement. One of them had booted a can into the road.
Normally, I'd have ignored them - well there were four of them to one of me. But seeing as I was on my bike, and seeing as I was pedalling downhill, I had the perfect opportunity to off-load.
"You're a f***king load of Neds!" I called out as I majestically swept past.
The can-kicker instantly tried to chase me down - he was running after me! I jeered at him and gave him the finger; after 20 yards he gave up.
And that, my friend, is how to deal with litter-louts. Abuse the bastards!

12 July 2014 Last updated at 12:59
Two men have been charged by detectives investigating a smash and grab raid by a moped gang on the Dorchester Hotel.

Unemployed brothers Reed Roberts, 23, and Skye Roberts, 19, are due to appear at Wimbledon Magistrates' Court in London today in connection with Thursday's robbery at the five-star hotel, Scotland Yard said.

The plush Mayfair venue was hit for the second time in a month by a moped-riding gang who smashed their way into the building in the early hours of the morning and broke into display cabinets.

The luxury hotel was hit in exactly the same way on June 10, when watches and jewellery were stolen in what police called a "well-planned" heist.

Reed and Skye Roberts, of Cubitt Street in King's Cross, north London, are both charged with robbery and possession with intent to supply a Class B drug.
The hotel is currently at the centre of a storm of controversy over its owner, the Sultan of Brunei, who is introducing sharia law to the country, which stipulates gay people should be stoned to death.
Kate Middleton earned campaigners' ire when she broke the boycott and went there for the wedding of her cousin earlier this month.

11 July 2014 Last updated at 16:59
A father who murdered his baby daughter by "vigorously shaking" her after smoking cannabis has been jailed for life to serve a minimum of 17 years. The trial of Ross Conlin, 29, of Sandy Lane, Farnborough, Hampshire, heard that he caused four-month-old Kiera Conlin to suffer a heart attack and bleeding to the brain while she was alone in his care on the bank holiday of May 6 last year.

His partner, Kelly-Marie Rayner, was acquitted at Winchester Crown Court of the charge of causing or allowing the death of a child. Detective Chief Inspector Scott Clarke, of Hampshire police, said: "The trial into the death of baby Kiera Conlin has been a harrowing and difficult experience for all those involved.

"We welcome this verdict and hope that Kiera's extended family have now got answers to at least some of the many questions they had around her untimely death. Kiera's death was at the hands of a man whom she most relied and depended upon for love and the most basic care. She was abused and horrendously let down by this man - her father.

"Without the abhorrent behaviour of her father, Kiera would still be alive today. Investigations into this type of case are often extremely complex and difficult for officers, staff and the family of the deceased. I would like thank the entire investigation team and the many medical professionals and specialists for all their hard work and dedication in bringing this case to an appropriate conclusion.

"I would also like to personally thank Kiera's extended family for their understanding and patience during what must have been one of the most challenging times of their lives."

Nigel Lickley QC, prosecuting, told the jury that the defendants were staying with Rayner's parents during the weekend of Kiera's death. Conlin had been left in charge of Kiera, while Rayner went to have her nails painted and her parents were out, when the injuries were suffered at some point after 10am that day.

Mr Lickley said: "Kiera was shaken violently, she may also have suffered further head impact. "Her injuries were so severe, having become unconscious and stopped breathing - she was in her father's hands at the time - she suffered a heart attack. She never recovered and was allowed to die the following day, the doctors unable to save her.

"She hadn't suffered those injuries as a result of choking or vomiting on her bottle as her father said but as a result of violent shaking by the adult holding her, her own father." He added that Conlin had inflicted the "terrible" injuries "probably in anger". Mr Lickley said that post mortem examinations showed that Kiera had suffered a rib fracture between four and eight weeks prior to her death with the same rib and another being fractured again about 14 days prior to her death along with three skull fractures.

She suffered further rib fractures between three and five days prior to her death and showed signs of previously having suffered bleeding to the eyes. Mr Lickley said that there was "stress and strain" in the household and Rayner feared that Conlin might leave her. He explained that a major cause was the lack of a "bond" between Conlin and his daughter and added: "Ross Conlin had had a good relationship with her but that relationship changed and he became unhappy and stressed by the lack of bond between he, father, and Kiera, daughter."

Other causes for the stress were money worries with Conlin taking out short-term loans to shore up their bank account. Conlin, who worked as a debt collector, had also been experiencing trouble at work and had been facing disciplinary procedures after his performance had "dipped".

And Conlin's drug use also added to the strain on the household, Mr Lickley said. He added: "He is a drug user, he smoked cannabis, he smoked cannabis on May 5th, the day before events on May 6th and historically at least had taken cocaine."


11 July 2014 Last updated at 11:53
A New South Wales judge has been suspended from presiding over criminal cases after comments in which he suggested incest may no longer be taboo.

Garry Neilson likened incest to homosexuality, suggesting just as gay sex was socially unacceptable in the 1950s and 60s but is now widely accepted, “a jury might find nothing untoward in the advance of a brother towards his sister once she had sexually matured.”

Neilson was making his comments earlier this week during the trial of a brother charged with raping his younger sister, the Sydney Morning Herald reported.The defendant had earlier pleaded guilty to sexually assaulting his sister when she was 10-11 years-old in 1973/74, but denied charges of sexual intercourse without consent in 1981.

Neilson said the sex which occurred when the victim was 10 or 11 occurred in a different context to the sex when she was 18.

He said: “By that stage they were both mature adults. The complainant had been sexually awoken, shall we say, by having two relationships with men and she had become ‘free’ when the second relationship broke down.”

He added the “only reason” incest is still a crime is because of the high risk of genetic abnormalities in children born from these relationships, “but even that falls away to an extent [because] there is such ease of contraception and readily access to abortion.”

On Friday the Daily Telegraph reported Neilson had been suspended from attending criminal matters pending the outcome of a Judicial Commission’s investigation. 

NSW Attorney-General Brad Hazzard told the newspaper: “Confidence in the judiciary is a critical part of ensuring broader community support for the legal system.

“The majority of this judiciary in this state do extremely good work day in and day out for the community.”

Crown Prosecutor Sally Dowling this week asked the Court of Criminal Appeal to appoint another judge other than Neilson because of the “misogynistic” attitude he displayed towards the complainant.

She said: "These remarks in my submission are completely disgraceful.
“The reference to abortion is particularly repellent.”

08 July 2014 Last updated at 20:19
A badly injured motorcyclist has been mugged by a thief who pretended to give him first aid, when he was in fact stealing cash.

The fake "good Samaritan" was caught on a cyclist's head camera when he came over to the site of a crash between a blue Triumph Bonneville motorcycle and silver Audi outside a supermarket in Hayes, west London last month.

The 51-year-old motorcyclist had serious leg injuries and was lying in the road bleeding heavily when the conman appeared to come to help.

He is suspected of stealing £40 cash from the stricken rider after the accident outside Lidl in Uxbridge Road, Hayes on June 7.
Pc Raj Patara said: "We appeal to anyone who may know the identity of this man who robbed a badly injured victim while he was in a state of shock and bleeding heavily. Do you recognise him?

"We know that a small crowd gathered at the scene and further witness mobile phone recordings may have been taken. We are keen to trace any new pieces of evidence. Where you there? Did you take a recording?"

The suspect is a light-skinned, slim black man, who is in his 30s. He was wearing a baseball cap backwards, tan coloured shorts and an orange patterned shirt, and had a strong West Indian accent.

Anyone with information can call police on 020 8246 1486 or Crimestoppers on 0800 555 111 to remain anonymous.


07 July 2014 Last updated at 15:59
A murder investigation has been launched after a 23-year-old university student was found dead.

Warwickshire Police said they have arrested three men on suspicion of murder after the body of Newcastle University student James Steen was found at an address in Rugby on Saturday.

Mr Steen, who is from Newcastle-upon-Tyne, was discovered after the ambulance service was called to a property in Wood Street at 6am.

The force said: "His death is currently being treated as unexplained but as part of police inquiries three local men, aged 31, 29 and 25, were arrested on suspicion of murder on Saturday morning.

"They were interviewed over the weekend and have since been bailed until September while investigations continue."

His next of kin have been informed.

06 July 2014 Last updated at 17:59
Two criminals have escaped from an open prison.

Philip Stephenson, 33, and Gareth Robinson, 24, fled HMP Kirkham in Lancashire together yesterday.

Stephenson was serving a sentence for firearms offences while Robinson was in prison for burglary, Greater Manchester Police said.
They are believed to have got into a silver Volkswagen Golf before heading to the Oldham area, where they are both originally from.

Detective Chief Inspector John Mazzolai said: "Neither of these men has been seen since they escaped from prison on Saturday.

"They are not to be approached by members of the public, but if anyone sees them or knows of their whereabouts, please contact GMP on 101 immediately. If you would prefer to pass on information anonymously, then you can do this by calling Crimestoppers on 0800 555 111.

"I would also like to remind people that if anyone is found to be assisting or harbouring these wanted men, they too will face being arrested and a possible prison sentence of their own. So please get in touch if you know where they are."

There has been a flurry of controversy over open prisons after a spate of inmates went on the run.

In the most high-profile case, Michael Wheatley, who is known as the "Skull Cracker", carried out a raid on a building society while on the run from HMP Standford Hill in Kent in May.

04 July 2014 Last updated at 17:59
As a barrister, I am no stranger to injustice. The client falsely accused, judges who might not accept my valid arguments or a sentence wrongly imposed. All are daily features of life at the Criminal Bar yet all are matters which the court process can deal with. A trial and a jury can deal with baseless accusations. The Court of Appeal stands ready to overturn errant rulings, or correct improper sentences. Our Criminal Justice System is, by and large, ready and able to remedy such matters and ensure that justice is done.

What should concern us all though, is a new class of injustice creeping into the system and one which not only can the Courts not deal with, but is one which is created by the Courts themselves. The problem is one of listing.

Listing is the process which assigns criminal cases to courts on any given date. Problems arise when the date between the alleged offence and the trial taking place become too long. Witness's memories fade. Defendants have matters hanging over them unfairly and for too long. Victims suffer and justice suffers alongside.

The issue can best be illustrated by describing a trial which I was involved in last week. I say a trial but it can more properly be described as an abortive trial. The allegation was one of rape. It dated back to July 2013. The defendant was arrested that same day but it was not until December that he was charged and brought before the court. A trial date was set down for June of this year, some 6 months after his first hearing. There are many who would say that 6 months is too long. I would agree. Unfortunately, a 6 month delay is fairly standard and not my cause for complaint. The real problem was the evening before the trial was due to start, I was contacted by the court to be informed that due to lack of available Judges the trial could not go ahead. Instead of attending court for trial, I attended so that a new date could be fixed. That date is in January of 2015, some 18 months after the offence is said to have taken place.

Should this have been a one off, then it would be deeply unfortunate but not a cause to write this article. Regrettably it was not a one off but evidence of a systemic failure. In court alongside me were 3 other counsel, all trying to get new dates for their trials which could not go ahead due to lack of court time. A burglary trial, a benefit fraud and a supply of class A drugs, all got shunted into 2015. The burglary trial was on its 4th such adjournment.

What makes these all too frequent adjournments such a matter of concern is the reason for lack of court time. It is not, as one might think, due to an increasing workload within the courts. In fact, quite the opposite is true. The latest statistics show falling crime and a decreasing workload. Rather, the blame can be laid at the doors of the Ministry of Justice and their constant cuts to budgets. The MoJ have quotas as to the amount of judicial sitting days they will pay for. In the past, Recorders (part time Judges) would be brought in to help deal with the workload. Nowadays, due to quotas and lack of budget they aren't. At Manchester Crown Court, the day my trial was due to start 2 courtrooms were empty and not sitting at all. The reason, cuts. An examination of court lists up and down the land shows a similar picture. Courts sitting empty, trials being adjourned and all due to a failure to put resources in to allow for a properly run justice system.

The consequence of this is injustice. For the complainant in my rape trial, she now has to suffer the ordeal of believing she was to be giving evidence, only to be told it is to be delayed until next year. For the defendant, he now has to have matters hanging over him for a further 6 months before he gets his day in court.

What makes matters worse is in fact there is no real cost saving. The failure to pay for sufficient judicial sitting days does not save money. The trial will take place at some point at which stage the cost accrues. The payment, like justice, is delayed. The problem though, is that when Justice is delayed, it is also denied.

What the MoJ fail to recognise is that they are not running a business. The purpose of the Criminal Justice System is not to see that costs are avoided but that victims are treated properly, the guilty are convicted and the innocent acquitted. With their constant cuts to the system and delayed trials becoming the norm, what was once a system to be proud of is fast becoming a system in meltdown, a system in disrepute. The sad truth is cuts do not lead to a more efficient system. Rather, they lead to avoidable delays and unfairness to all.

04 July 2014 Last updated at 12:59
A children's doctor is accused of sexual offences against cancer sufferers in his care aged as young as 11, prosecutors have told a court.

Dr Myles Bradbury faces four counts of sexual assault and four counts of engaging in, or inciting a boy to engage in, sexual activity.

The 41-year-old paediatric haematologist at Addenbrooke's Hospital, Cambridge, appeared at Cambridge Magistrates' Court today.

Prosecutor Delia Matthews said: "The allegation is an abuse of trust in that he was the doctor of these children - boys as young as 11 who were cancer sufferers in his care."
The alleged offences date back to 2011 and relate to boys aged between 11 and 15.

He also faces two charges of making indecent images of a child and one count of voyeurism, in which it is alleged he secretly filmed somebody engaging in a sex act.

Wearing a dark blue suit, white shirt and tie, Bradbury, of Herringswell, Suffolk, spoke only to confirm his name, date of birth and address.

He did not indicate any likely plea and was bailed to appear before Cambridge Crown Court on July 11.

He left the court building via a rear entrance to avoid camera crews waiting outside.

Cambridge University Hospitals NHS Trust, which runs Addenbrooke's Hospital, has set up a helpline to be used "if parents, patients or former patients have any concerns".

The trust added it was working closely with the NSPCC.

The helpline, on 0800 389 8625, can be reached between 8am and 9pm on weekdays and 9am to 5pm at weekends.

Since the alleged offences, Bradbury has left his job at the hospital and has not worked there this year.

A trust spokesman said: "The news that Dr Myles Bradbury, formerly of CUH (Cambridge University Hospitals NHS Trust), has been charged with offences against children will be distressing for many patients, their families and staff.

"Our main priority at CUH is the safety of our patients.

"As soon as concerns were raised nine months ago, Dr Myles Bradbury was excluded from working at the trust and is no longer employed here.

"Since then we have worked closely with Cambridgeshire Police and partners, including the NSPCC, to make sure that individuals are contacted and support is offered throughout this difficult time."

04 July 2014 Last updated at 02:59
The Director of Public Prosecutions (DPP) has been urged to look at claims that a former Tory MP was found with child pornography videos but escaped without any action being taken.

The politician was allegedly stopped by Customs while driving back to the UK via Dover and found to have explicit videos of children "clearly under 12".

The Daily Telegraph reported that the politician was not arrested or charged following the incident in the 1980s and the videos and paperwork have subsequently gone missing

The Customs officer has spoken to detectives on Operation Fernbridge, an investigation into allegations of sexual abuse by people including high-profile figures at the Elm Guest House in Barnes, south west London.

Labour MP Tom Watson, who has led calls for a comprehensive inquiry into historic child abuse, said he was writing to DPP Alison Saunders to ask her to examine the evidence relating to the unnamed Tory politician.

He said: "It's a remarkable revelation. If true, it shows that a crime was not investigated but also is shocking because it's yet another example of intelligence going missing.

"I hope the DPP will share the concern of many MPs about this.

"It has got to be fully investigated and also shows why there are a growing number of calls from people for a wider overarching inquiry into historic allegations of abuse."

Former Home Secretary Was Given Westminster Paedophile Dossier — Which Then Disappeared

The Metropolitan Police said: "We are not prepared to give a running commentary on Operation Fernbridge, which is an ongoing operation."

The Daily Telegraph reported that the senior Tory's name was included in a dossier handed to then-home secretary Lord Brittan by Conservative MP Geoffrey Dickens.

Lord Brittan was forced to defend his handling of the 1980s dossier alleging paedophile activity in Westminster - after the Government admitted it appeared to have been destroyed.

Meanwhile, it emerged that four more cases of historic sex abuse have been referred to the police by Home Office officials in recent months, following a review ordered last year covering the period 1979 and 1999.

A review of a database containing details of more than 746,000 files identified 13 items of information about alleged child abuse, including four cases involving Home Office staff.

Nine of these items of information, including all of the cases involving Home Office officials, were either already known to the police or were reported to them by the Home Office at the time.

The remaining four have now been passed to the police for a "proper assessment", although the investigator who carried out the review said the information was likely to be of "limited value".

A Home Office spokesman said: "In response to concerns raised in Parliament and the media relating to the handling by the department of historical allegations of abuse, the permanent secretary commissioned an independent review of all relevant papers received by the department between 1979 to 1999 to identify any information received and the outcome.

"The review concluded the Home Office acted appropriately, referring information received during this period to the relevant authorities."

Home Affairs Select Committee chairman Keith Vaz has asked the department for further information and the Home Office said: "It would be inappropriate to comment further until we have responded to the chair's request."

A spokeswoman for the Prime Minister said the police were the "right authorities" to investigate the historic allegations, as Downing Street continued to resist calls for a wider inquiry.

"What matters here are that allegations are properly investigated, the people to do that are the police and that's why it's important that any evidence that is uncovered is alerted to the police," she said.
